Maryland, session 2025, HB1359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–811.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “DISPLACEMENT” MEANS THE PROVISION OF
STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES BY THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF
EDUCATION IN A MANNER THAT PRECLUDES A PRIVATE PERSON THAT HAS BEEN
PROVIDING THE SERVICES FROM CONTINUING TO PROVIDE THE SERVICES.
(2) “DISPLACEMENT” DOES NOT INCLUDE CIRCUMSTANCES IN
WHICH:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1359*

HOUSE BILL 1359
(I) THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION DOES NOT
RENEW A CONTRACT FOR STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES FOR CAUSE,
AND AT THE END OF THE CONTRACT TERM, CONTRACTS WITH ANOTHER PRIVATE
PERSON TO PROVIDE THE SERVICES; OR
(II) THE PERSON THAT HAS BEEN PROVIDING THE STUDENT
BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES:
1. HAS BEEN FOUND TO HAVE ACTED IN A MANNER
THREATENING TO PUBLIC HEALTH OR SAFETY;
2. HAS BEEN FOUND TO HAVE COMMITTED A MATERIAL
BREACH OF A CONTRACT FOR STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES; OR
3. REFUSES TO CONTINUE TO PROVIDE STUDENT BUS
TRANSPORTATION SERVICES UNDER THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF AN EXISTING
AGREEMENT.
(B) AT LEAST 10 YEARS BEFORE TAKING ANY ACTION THAT RESULTS IN THE
DISPLACEMENT OF A PERSON THAT HAS BEEN PROVIDING STUDENT BUS
TRANSPORTATION SERVICES IN CHARLES COUNTY, THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD
OF EDUCATION SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE INTENT TO DISPLACE, SENT BY
FIRST–CLASS MAIL AT LEAST 45 DAYS BEFORE THE HEARING REQUIRED UNDER
ITEM (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, TO EACH PERSON THAT PROVIDES THE SERVICES IN
CHARLES COUNTY; AND
(2) (I) HOLD AT LEAST ONE PUBLIC HEARING ON THE
ADVISABILITY OF THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION PROVIDING THE
STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES; AND
(II) PROVIDE NOTICE OF THE HEARING TO THE PUBLIC BY
PUBLISHING A NOTIFICATION IN A NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION IN THE
COUNTY ONCE EACH WEEK FOR 2 SUCCESSIVE WEEKS BEFORE THE HEARING.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, WITHIN 1
YEAR AFTER THE PUBLIC HEARING, AND AT LEAST 5 YEARS BEFORE ANY
DISPLACEMENT, THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION SHALL PROVIDE
WRITTEN NOTICE BY REGISTERED MAIL OF THE DISPLACEMENT TO THE PERSON
PROVIDING THE STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES.

HOUSE BILL 1359 3
(2) THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION MAY BEGIN
PROVIDING STUDENT BUS TRANSPORTATION SERVICES OR CONTRACT WITH
ANOTHER PERSON TO PROVIDE THE SERVICES LESS THAN 5 YEARS AFTER
PROVIDING THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF:
(I) THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION PAYS THE
DISPLACED PERSON THAT HAS BEEN PROVIDING THE SERVICES AN AMOUNT EQUAL
TO THE PERSON’S GROSS RECEIPTS FOR PROVIDING THE SERVICES IN THE COUNTY
FOR THE PRECEDING 24–MONTH PERIOD;
(II) THE CHARLES COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION AND THE
PERSON THAT HAS BEEN PROVIDING THE SERVICES AGREE TO A DIFFERENT NOTICE
PERIOD OR COMPENSATION AMOUNT; OR
(III) THE PERSON STOPS PROVIDING THE SERVICES IN THE
COUNTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.